Washington statutes.
RCW 15.13.455

Injunction to restrain operation as nursery dealer or Christmas tree grower without valid license—Costs, attorneys' fees, and expenses. (Effective until July 1, 2030.)

(1) The director may apply to the superior court of Thurston county for a prompt hearing on, and the court shall have jurisdiction upon, and for cause shown the court shall, without proof that an adequate remedy at law does not exist, grant an injunction restraining any person from operating as a nursery dealer or Christmas tree grower without a valid license.

(2) An order restraining any person from operating as a nursery dealer or Christmas tree grower without a valid license shall contain such provision for the payment of pertinent court costs and reasonable attorneys' fees and administrative expenses as is equitable and the court deems appropriate in the circumstances.

[ 2007 c 335 s 16; 2000 c 144 s 27; 1983 1st ex.s. c 73 s 7.]

NOTES:

Expiration date—2019 c 206; 2013 c 72; 2007 c 335: See note following RCW 15.13.250.

PDFRCW 15.13.455

Injunction to restrain operation as nursery dealer without valid license—Costs, attorneys' fees, and expenses. (Effective July 1, 2030.)

(1) The director may apply to the superior court of Thurston county for a prompt hearing on, and the court shall have jurisdiction upon, and for cause shown the court shall, without proof that an adequate remedy at law does not exist, grant an injunction restraining any person from operating as a nursery dealer without a valid license.

(2) An order restraining any person from operating as a nursery dealer without a valid license shall contain such provision for the payment of pertinent court costs and reasonable attorneys' fees and administrative expenses as is equitable and the court deems appropriate in the circumstances.

[ 2000 c 144 s 27; 1983 1st ex.s. c 73 s 7.]